Utah statutes.
20A-3-408.   Voting of ballot by military or overseas citizen voter.
(1) (a)  The military or overseas citizen voter shall:
(i)  upon receipt of the ballot, mark it in secret;
(ii)  seal it in the ballot envelope provided for that purpose; and
(iii)  execute the registration and voting certificate and mailing affidavit
on the back of the envelope.
(b) (i)  If the military or overseas citizen voter is physically disabled so
as to be unable to see or write, he may request assistance from two persons,
each of whom shall be qualified to certify to the registration and voting
certificate.
(ii)  The military or overseas citizen voter shall tell those persons how he
wishes his ballot marked.
(iii)  Those persons shall mark the ballot as directed by the military or
overseas citizen voter in his presence.
(iv)  One of the persons assisting the military or overseas citizen voter
shall:
(A)  read to the voter the registration and voting certificate upon the
ballot;
(B)  fill in its blanks as the voter directs; and
(C)  sign, on the line provided for the signature of the voter, the name of
the voter and his own name.
(2) (a)  The ballot shall be sent by any available mail service to the county
clerk who issued it.
(b)  The military or overseas citizen voter is not required to return the
ballot by registered mail.
(3)  The ballot is not valid unless:
(a) (i)  it is clearly postmarked by the appropriate military post office, the
Fleet Post Office (FPO) or the Army/Air Force Post Office (APO), before
election day and received in the office of the election officer before noon on
the day of the official canvass following the election; or
(ii)  the voter has signed the mailing affidavit on the back of the ballot
envelope and the ballot is received in the office of the election officer
before noon on the day of the official canvass following the election.
(b)  The county clerk shall cause a mailing affidavit to be printed on the
back of the ballot envelope that is in substantially the following form:
"I certify that I am/may be unable to obtain a proper postmark and, subject to
penalty of law for false statements, swear or affirm that this ballot was
voted and mailed before the day of the election.
Signature of
Voter______________________________________________________________
Date____________________________________________________________________
To be signed when voter is physically unable to see or write:
______________________________________________________Signature of additional
witness who is a commissioned, noncommissioned, or petty officer not below the
rank of sergeant or its equivalent, or another person authorized to administer
oaths who does swear, under penalty of law for false statements, that at the
request of _____________________(name of the voter), I completed the mailing
affidavit because the voter was unable to see or write because of a physical
disability."
